Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; FORENSIC INTERVIEW TRAINING SCHOLARSHIPS.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of children, youth, and families for grants to provide training scholarships for recipients to attend nationally recognized forensic interview protocol training. Eligible grantees must award scholarships for recipients to attend basic forensic interview training, advanced forensic interview training, and specialized interview topics training. Scholarship recipients may include individuals in law enforcement, child protection, and prosecution; health professionals investigating, treating, and managing child maltreatment cases in Minnesota; advocates working with a multidisciplinary team; and forensic interviewers at children's advocacy centers. new text end